Illinois, session 104th, HB3710.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act 5is amended by changing Section 4 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 120/4)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1404)7    Sec. 4. Rights of crime victims. 8    (a) Crime victims shall have the following rights:9        (1) The right to be treated with fairness and respect 10    for their dignity and privacy and to be free from 11    harassment, intimidation, and abuse throughout the 12    criminal justice process.13        (1.1) When a person reports being a crime victim as 14    defined in Section 3, the right to be treated with 15    fairness and respect during the investigatory process, 16    including the right to be free from deception, which is 17    the knowing communication of false facts about evidence. 18        (1.5) The right to notice and to a hearing before a 19    court ruling on a request for access to any of the victim's 20    records, information, or communications which are 21    privileged or confidential by law. 22        (1.6) Except as otherwise provided in Section 9.5 of 23    the Criminal Identification Act or Section 3-3013 of the   HB3710 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10600 RLC 20676 b1    Counties Code, whenever a person's DNA profile is 2    collected due to the person being a victim of a crime, as 3    identified by law enforcement, that specific profile 4    collected in conjunction with that criminal investigation 5    shall not be entered into any DNA database. Nothing in 6    this paragraph (1.6) shall be interpreted to contradict 7    rules and regulations developed by the Federal Bureau of 8    Investigation relating to the National DNA Index System or 9    Combined DNA Index System. 10        (2) The right to timely notification of all court 11    proceedings.12        (3) The right to communicate with the prosecution.13        (4) The right to be heard at any post-arraignment 14    court proceeding in which a right of the victim is at issue 15    and any court proceeding involving a post-arraignment 16    release decision, plea, or sentencing.17        (5) The right to be notified of the conviction, the 18    sentence, the imprisonment and the release of the accused.19        (6) The right to the timely disposition of the case 20    following the arrest of the accused.21        (7) The right to be reasonably protected from the 22    accused through the criminal justice process.23        (7.5) The right to have the safety of the victim and 24    the victim's family considered in determining whether to 25    release the defendant and setting conditions of release 26    after arrest and conviction.   HB3710 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10600 RLC 20676 b1        (8) The right to be present at the trial and all other 2    court proceedings on the same basis as the accused, unless 3    the victim is to testify and the court determines that the 4    victim's testimony would be materially affected if the 5    victim hears other testimony at the trial.6        (9) The right to have present at all court 7    proceedings, including proceedings under the Juvenile 8    Court Act of 1987, subject to the rules of evidence, an 9    advocate and other support person of the victim's choice.10        (10) The right to restitution.11    (b) Any law enforcement agency that investigates an 12offense committed in this State shall provide a crime victim 13with a written statement and explanation of the rights of 14crime victims under this amendatory Act of the 99th General 15Assembly within 48 hours of law enforcement's initial contact 16with a victim. The statement shall include information about 17crime victim compensation, including how to contact the Office 18of the Illinois Attorney General to file a claim, and 19appropriate referrals to local and State programs that provide 20victim services. The content of the statement shall be 21provided to law enforcement by the Attorney General. Law 22enforcement shall also provide a crime victim with a sign-off 23sheet that the victim shall sign and date as an 24acknowledgement that he or she has been furnished with 25information and an explanation of the rights of crime victims 26and compensation set forth in this Act.  HB3710 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10600 RLC 20676 b1    (b-5) Upon the request of the victim, the law enforcement 2agency having jurisdiction shall provide a free copy of the 3police report concerning the victim's incident, as soon as 4practicable, but in no event later than 5 business days from 5the request. 6    (c) The Clerk of the Circuit Court shall post the rights of 7crime victims set forth in Article I, Section 8.1(a) of the 8Illinois Constitution and subsection (a) of this Section 9within 3 feet of the door to any courtroom where criminal 10proceedings are conducted. The clerk may also post the rights 11in other locations in the courthouse.12    (d) At any point, the victim has the right to retain a 13victim's attorney who may be present during all stages of any 14interview, investigation, or other interaction with 15representatives of the criminal justice system. Treatment of 16the victim should not be affected or altered in any way as a 17result of the victim's decision to exercise this right. 18(Source: P.A. 103-792, eff. 1-1-25.)